Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB571.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Rebuild Pennsylvania Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Rebuild Pennsylvania Board established under section 3."Commonwealth agency." A department, board, commission, authority or other officer or agency of the Commonwealth. The term does not include any court or other officer or agency of 123456789101112131415161718 the unified judicial system or the General Assembly or an officer or agency of the General Assembly."Fund." The Rebuild Pennsylvania Fund established under section 6."Program." The Rebuild Pennsylvania Program established under section 4.Section 3. Rebuild Pennsylvania Board.(a) Establishment.--The Rebuild Pennsylvania Board is established as an independent administrative board. The Department of Community and Economic Development shall provide administrative assistance to the board.(b) Composition.--The board shall be composed of the following members:(1) One individual appointed by the Governor.(2) One individual appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(3) One individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(4) One individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(5) One individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(c) Chairperson.--The Governor shall select a member of the board to serve as chairperson. The members of the board shall select from among themselves any other officers as they shall determine.(d) Meetings.--The board shall meet at the call of the chairperson.(e) Quorum.--All members of the board shall be necessary to constitute a quorum. The consent of all members of the board 20250HB0571PN0575 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be necessary to take an action of the board.(f) Bylaws.--The board shall adopt bylaws as the board deems necessary governing the conduct of the board.(g) Participation and voting.--(1) Members of the board may participate in a meeting by telephone conference or other electronic technology by means in which all individuals participating in the meeting can hear each other.(2) Members of the board may delegate votes to designees acting on their behalf only after informing the chairperson in writing.(h) Compensation.--The members of the board shall receive no compensation for service as members of the board but shall be reimbursed for all necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the performance of duties as members of the board.(i) Appointments.--Appointing authorities shall appoint initial members to the board within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection. Any appointee to the board may be removed with or without cause by the appointing authority. When a vacancy occurs in the board, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor member within 30 days of the vacancy.(j) Dissolution.--The board shall dissolve when all money available for the purposes of this act has been exhausted and all applicable duties and responsibilities under law have been completed. Prior to dissolution, the board shall transmit notice of the dissolution to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 4. Establishment of program.20250HB0571PN0575 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Rebuild Pennsylvania Program is established in the board. The program shall provide financial assistance in the form of grants, loans or other forms of financing or funding for the eligible uses specified under section 5.Section 5. Use of program money.(a) Allocation of program money.--(1) The board shall allocate program money among all of the following categories:(i) Flood control infrastructure.(ii) Disaster response.(iii) Green infrastructure.(iv) Redevelopment, repairs and blight demolition.(v) Storm water infrastructure.(vi) Brownfield cleanup.(vii) Contaminant remediation in schools and child-care centers.(viii) Business development and site selection.(ix) Energy efficiency.(x) Transportation infrastructure.(2) Within 15 days of the determination of the allocations under paragraph (1), the board shall provide the Secretary of the Budget with a written notification of the allocations of program money.(b) Financial assistance.--After the board provides the written notification required under subsection (a)(2), program money shall be used to provide financial assistance in the form of grants, loans or other forms of financing or funding as provided under subsection (c).(c) Use.--(1) For flood control infrastructure, program money may 20250HB0571PN0575 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be used as follows:(i) For the Stream Improvement Program administered by the Department of Environmental Protection, to provide grants to municipalities and county conservation districts for stream restoration and maintenance projects.(ii) For grants from the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority, to Commonwealth agencies and political subdivisions for acquisition, construction and improvement, including the installation of security measures, expansion, repair or rehabilitation of all or part of a flood control system. As used in this subparagraph, the term "flood control system" includes levees, dikes, walls, culverts, revetment and dams, including high-hazard unsafe dams, lakes, reservoirs and other works and improvements deemed necessary to prevent floods or control, preserve, restore and regulate the flow of rivers and streams.(2) For disaster response measures, program money may be used by the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency as follows:(i) To establish the Disaster Assistance Program for the purpose of providing grants, limited to expenses or needs that are not covered by private insurance or do not qualify for Federal assistance, to:(A) Meet disaster-related necessary expenses or serious needs of individuals or families directly affected by a declared disaster emergency under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 73 Subch. A (relating to the Governor and disaster emergencies), regardless of whether a 20250HB0571PN0575 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 presidential disaster declaration was issued for the area or the disaster emergency declaration remains in effect at the time of the grant award.(B) Address landslide damage where damages to private property collectively exceed $500,000, regardless of whether a disaster emergency was declared.(ii) To establish the Pipeline Preparedness and Response Fund for the following purposes:(A) Funding State-administered emergency response training, planning and coordination for county or municipal employees, volunteer firefighters or volunteer emergency medical technicians.(B) Providing grants to counties, municipalities and school districts where a natural gas or hazardous liquid pipeline is located in a high-consequence area as determined by the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency. Grants under this clause shall be awarded for emergency planning, coordination, communication and implementation, training and equipment acquisition.(iii) To provide reimbursement for the costs incurred by a county or municipality during a response to an emergency relating to pipelines within the county or municipality. The costs eligible for reimbursement may include police and fire protection costs for the county or municipality during the response.(3) For green infrastructure, program money may be used as follows:(i) By the Department of Environmental Protection 20250HB0571PN0575 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for existing programs for watershed protection.(ii) By the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources for existing programs to improve State parks and State forests, watershed restoration and open space preservation and to provide community park and recreation grants.(iii) By the Department of Agriculture for existing programs for county-based farmland preservation and for transfer to the State Conservation Commission to provide financial and technical assistance grants to conservation districts for the implementation of best management practices on farms within this Commonwealth.(iv) By the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission for capital improvement projects for existing lands and facilities.(v) By the Pennsylvania Game Commission for capital improvement projects to existing lands and facilities.(vi) By the Department of Transportation and the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources for the purpose of funding the development of new all-terrain vehicle trails, connectors and feasibility studies.(4) For redevelopment, repairs and blight demolition, program money may be used by the Department of Community and Economic Development for:(i) Main Street and downtown redevelopment.(ii) A program to develop and maintain affordable housing.(iii) The Keystone Communities program.(iv) Establishing a whole home repair program.(v) Establishing the Blight Demolition and 20250HB0571PN0575 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Redevelopment Fund for the purpose of providing grants, loans or other forms of financing to local entities, including land banks, counties, cities, municipalities, redevelopment authorities, economic development groups, community development agencies and others for the planning, demolition, remediation and redevelopment of blighted areas.(5) For storm water infrastructure, program money may be used by the Department of Environmental Protection for the establishment of the Storm Water Control Grant Program for the purpose of providing grants to authorities and municipalities with separate storm sewers as defined by 40 CFR 122.26(b)(8) (relating to storm water discharges) to implement pollution reduction plans and for compliance with the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.864, No.167), known as the Storm Water Management Act. Priority for participation in the Storm Water Control Grant Program shall be given to eligible applicants that are currently subject to a Federal or State court or agency order, consent decree or new permit discharge requirements and eligible applicants that propose to work to achieve cost-effective compliance as part of a regional collaborative approach.(6) For brownfield cleanup, program money may be deposited into the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund established under section 1761-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, and for uses consistent with the act of October 18, 1988 (P.L.756, No.108), known as the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Act.(7) For contaminant remediation in schools and child-care centers, defined as the premises where care is provided 20250HB0571PN0575 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at any one time for seven or more children unrelated to the operator, program money may be used as follows:(i) By the Department of Health to provide grants to abate lead contaminated paint found in schools, child-care centers and residences in this Commonwealth.(ii) By the Department of Education and the Department of Human Services to provide grants to remediate lead contamination in the drinking water of schools and child-care centers in this Commonwealth.(iii) By the Department of Education to provide grants for asbestos abatement in schools.(8) For business development and site selection, program money may be used for the Business in Our Sites Program established under 64 Pa.C.S. § 1551 (relating to Business in Our Sites Program) to provide financial assistance.(9) For energy efficiency, program money may be used as follows:(i) By the Department of Community and Economic Development for the Alternative and Clean Energy Program to provide grants or loans for the utilization, development and construction of alternative and clean energy projects in this Commonwealth.(ii) To provide money to the Natural Gas Infrastructure Development Fund established under section 1742-A.1 of The Fiscal Code.(10) For transportation infrastructure, program money may be used as follows:(i) By the Department of Transportation to provide money to the Multimodal Transportation Fund for all of the following purposes:20250HB0571PN0575 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) The construction, reconstruction or maintenance of any roads and bridges owned or maintained by a county, municipality, person, association or corporation, other than a highway or bridge owned, controlled or maintained by the Department of Transportation or any tolling authority.(B) To increase bicycle and pedestrian paths and access.(ii) By the Department of Transportation to fund the maintenance of State-owned four-digit roads in counties with a population of less than 150,000 based on the 2020 Federal decennial census.(iii) By the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources and the State Conservation Commission to provide grants for dirt, gravel and low-volume road maintenance as provided under 75 Pa.C.S. § 9106 (relating to dirt, gravel and low-volume road maintenance).(iv) To provide money to the Public Transportation Trust Fund to provide financial assistance for programs of Statewide significance under 74 Pa.C.S. § 1516 (relating to programs of Statewide significance).(d) Diversity.--(1) In providing financial assistance in the form of grants, loans or other forms of financing or funding under subsection (b), a Commonwealth agency shall consider regional and socioeconomic diversity. The board shall develop regional and socioeconomic diversity guidelines for each Commonwealth agency to consider when providing financial assistance.(2) When a Commonwealth agency uses a competitive grant 20250HB0571PN0575 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 process as the method for providing financial assistance, the Commonwealth agency shall provide outreach and educational programming to encourage and support the submission of applications from varying types of communities.(e) Matching funds.--Except as otherwise provided by the laws of this Commonwealth, the following apply:(1) A Commonwealth agency may require that financial assistance provided under this section be matched with other funds. When matching is required, the Commonwealth agency shall establish criteria for the amount and type of matching funds.(2) An applicant or recipient of funding received as a result of this act, or a Commonwealth agency, may use funding resulting from this act as matching funds for other Federal or State grant opportunities and may use other Federal or State funds as matching funds for the funding resulting from this section.(f) Applications.--To the extent feasible, Commonwealth agencies may permit an applicant to apply to more than one grant program in one application.Section 6. Rebuild Pennsylvania Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Rebuild Pennsylvania Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of implementing the program. All money deposited into the fund shall not lapse. The amount of loans repaid under section 5 shall be deposited into the fund.(b) Appropriation and transfer.--All money deposited into the fund is appropriated to the department under section 5 for the purposes specified in section 5(c). The sum of $3,000,000,000 is transfered from the General Fund to the fund 20250HB0571PN0575 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for fiscal year 2024-2025.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0571PN0575 - 12 - 123